Utah statutes.
4-32-21.   Denial of application for farm custom slaughter permit -- Venue
for judicial review.

(1)  Any applicant, whose application for a license to operate a
slaughterhouse or to obtain a farm custom slaughter permit is denied, may file
a request for agency action with the department, requesting a hearing on the
issue of denial.
(2) (a)  Any person who is aggrieved by an order issued under this section may
obtain judicial review.
(b)  Venue for judicial review of informal adjudicative proceeding is in the
district court in the county in which the alleged unlawful activity occurred
or, in the case of an order denying a license application, in the county where
the applicant resides.
(3)  The attorney general's office shall represent the department in any
original action or any appeal under this section.
